Utah statutes.
17-20-4.   Duties of county clerk.

A county clerk shall:

(1)  issue all marriage licenses and keep a register of marriages as provided by law;

(2)  execute under the clerk's seal and in the name of and for the county, all deeds and conveyances of all real estate conveyed by the county;

(3)  take and certify acknowledgments and administer oaths;

(4)  keep a fee book as provided by law; and

(5)  take charge of and safely keep the seal of the county, and keep other records and perform other duties as may be prescribed by law.



Amended by Chapter 241, 2001 General Session

